Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-142.06
Certificate of title as assembled vehicle; application for certificate of title indicating year, make, and model; procedure.

An owner of a vehicle which has been issued a certificate of title as an assembled vehicle prior to April 12, 2018, in this state may have the vehicle inspected by a qualified car club representative who shall determine whether or not any modifications or replacement parts are essentially the same in design and material to that originally supplied by the manufacturer for the specific year, make, and model of vehicle and obtain a statement as provided in section 60-142.03. The owner may apply for a certificate of title indicating the year, make, and model of the vehicle by presenting the statement and an application for certificate of title to the department. After review of the application, the department shall issue the certificate of title to the owner if the vehicle meets the specifications provided in section 60-142.02.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 22.